South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5241.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 3, Title 56 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Article 156 Order of the Palmetto Special License Plates Section 56-3-16510.  The Department of Motor Vehicles may issue "Order of the Palmetto" special license plates to owners of private passenger motor vehicles registered in their names. The applicant must be a recipient of the Order of the Palmetto. The requirements for production and distribution of the plate are those set forth in Section 56-3-8100. The biennial fee for this plate is the regular registration fee set forth in Article 5, Chapter 3 of this title. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----